Wisconsin, session 2025, AB813.
do enact as follows:AB813,11Section 1. 238.143 (2) of the statutes is repealed.AB813,22Section 2. 238.143 (3) (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB813,2,33238.143 (3) (title) Opportunity attraction and promotion sponsorships.AB813,34Section 3. 238.143 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB813,3,65238.143 (3) (a) The corporation shall award grants to sponsor eligible 6applicants for major opportunities and events projects initiatives as provided under 1par. pars. (b) and (cm). The corporation shall prescribe the form of sponsorship 2application and the information required to be submitted with an a sponsorship 3application, which shall include an. Prior to awarding a sponsorship, the 4corporation shall estimate of the projected direct and indirect economic benefits of 5the proposed opportunity or event to the state and a related cost-benefit analysis 6concerning the opportunity or event.AB813,47Section 4. 238.143 (3) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB813,3,138238.143 (3) (b) (intro.) An Except as provided in par. (cm), an eligible 9applicant shall expend all grant sponsorship moneys on a project an initiative as 10specified in the application to attract to this state or host in this state, or both, a 11major opportunity or event that is open to the public, whether or not free of charge. 12Specifically, grant sponsorship moneys may be used to undertake a project to do one 13or more of the following:AB813,514Section 5. 238.143 (3) (c) of the statutes is repealed.AB813,615Section 6. 238.143 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB813,4,416238.143 (3) (cm) An eligible applicant may expend sponsorship moneys on an 17initiative, as specified in the application, to attract to this state or host in this state, 18or both, a major opportunity or event that is not open to the public if the corporation 19determines that the opportunity or event will attract national exposure to this state 20or contribute substantially to statewide or regional economic growth. The 21corporation shall give special consideration to applications for sponsorship moneys 22under this paragraph for initiatives the corporation determines would occur during 23a tourist offseason or a period of economic need for the state. No sponsorship 24moneys may be expended under this paragraph for opportunities or events that the 1corporation determines are regularly scheduled in this state or rotate destinations 2within the state. In each fiscal year, of all the moneys the corporation allocates to 3the program under this section, no more than 25 percent of those moneys may be 4expended under this paragraph.AB813,75Section 7. 238.143 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB813,4,96238.143 (4) Matching requirement. The corporation may not award a grant 7sponsorship under sub. (3) unless the eligible applicant has secured from nonstate 8sources cash or in-kind contributions in an amount equal to the amount of the 9proposed grant sponsorship award.AB813,810Section 8. 238.143 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB813,4,1511238.143 (6) Annual report. No later than October 1 of each year, the 12corporation shall submit a report to the joint committee on finance for the previous 13fiscal year that includes a detailed description of each grant sponsorship awarded 14under sub. (3), including the eligible applicant’s analysis corporation’s estimate 15concerning the opportunity or event.AB813,4,1616